Virginia statutes. Title 9.1. Commonwealth Public Safety.
Chapter 9. Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry Act.
§ 9.1-903.
Registration and reregistration procedures.

Every person convicted, including juveniles tried and convicted in the circuit courts pursuant to § 16.1-269.1, whether sentenced as an adult or juvenile, of an offense for which registration is required and every juvenile found delinquent of an offense for which registration is required under subsection C of §

9.1-902

shall be required upon conviction to register, reregister, and verify his registration information with the Department of State Police. The court shall order the person to provide to the local law-enforcement agency of the county or city where he physically resides all information required by the State Police for inclusion in the Registry. The court shall immediately remand the person to the custody of the local law-enforcement agency for the purpose of obtaining the person’s fingerprints and photographs of a type and kind specified by the State Police for inclusion in the Registry. Upon conviction, the local law-enforcement agency shall forthwith forward to the State Police all the necessary registration information.

Every person required to register shall register in person within three days of his release from confinement in a state, local or juvenile correctional facility, in a state civil commitment program for sexually violent predators or, if a sentence of confinement is not imposed, within three days of suspension of the sentence or in the case of a juvenile of disposition. A person required to register shall register, and as part of the registration shall submit to be photographed, submit to have a sample of his blood, saliva, or tissue taken for DNA (deoxyribonucleic acid) analysis and submission to the DNA data bank to determine identification characteristics specific to the person, provide electronic mail address information, any instant message, chat or other Internet communication name or identity information that the person uses or intends to use, submit to have his fingerprints and palm prints taken, provide information regarding his place of employment, and provide motor vehicle, watercraft and aircraft registration information for all motor vehicles, watercraft and aircraft owned by him. The local law-enforcement agency shall obtain from the person who presents himself for registration or reregistration one set of fingerprints, electronic mail address information, any instant message, chat or other Internet communication name or identity information that the person uses or intends to use, one set of palm prints, place of employment information, motor vehicle, watercraft and aircraft registration information for all motor vehicles, watercraft and aircraft owned by the registrant, proof of residency and a photograph of a type and kind specified by the State Police for inclusion in the Registry and advise the person of his duties regarding reregistration and verification of his registration information. The local law-enforcement agency shall obtain from the person who presents himself for registration a sample of his blood, saliva or tissue taken for DNA (deoxyribonucleic acid) analysis to determine identification characteristics specific to the person. If a sample from the person is stored in the DNA data bank, as indicated by the Department of Forensic Science DNA data bank sample tracking system, no additional sample shall be taken. The local law-enforcement agency shall forthwith forward to the State Police all necessary registration information.

To establish proof of residence in Virginia, a person who has a permanent physical address shall present one photo-identification form issued by a governmental agency of the Commonwealth which contains the person’s complete name, gender, date of birth and complete physical address. The local law-enforcement agency shall forthwith forward to the State Police a copy of the identification presented by the person required to register.

Any person required to register shall also reregister in person with the local law-enforcement agency following any change of name or any change of residence, whether within or without the Commonwealth. The person shall register in person with the local law-enforcement agency within three days following his change of name. If his new residence is within the Commonwealth, the person shall register in person with the local law-enforcement agency where his new residence is located within three days following his change in residence. If the new residence is located outside of the Commonwealth, the person shall register in person with the local law-enforcement agency where he previously registered within 10 days prior to his change of residence. If a probation or parole officer becomes aware of a change of name or residence for any of his probationers or parolees required to register, the probation or parole officer shall notify the State Police forthwith of learning of the change. Whenever a person subject to registration changes residence to another state, the State Police shall notify the designated law-enforcement agency of that state.

Any person required to register shall reregister in person with the local law-enforcement agency where his residence is located within three days following any change of the place of employment, whether within or without the Commonwealth. If a probation or parole officer becomes aware of a change of the place of employment for any of his probationers or parolees required to register, the probation or parole officer shall notify the State Police forthwith upon learning of the change of the person’s place of employment. Whenever a person subject to registration changes his place of employment to another state, the State Police shall notify the designated law-enforcement agency of that state.

Any person required to register shall reregister in person with the local law-enforcement agency where his residence is located within three days following any change of owned motor vehicle, watercraft and aircraft registration information, whether within or without the Commonwealth. If a probation or parole officer becomes aware of a change of owned motor vehicle, watercraft and aircraft registration information for any of his probationers or parolees required to register, the probation or parole officer shall notify the State Police forthwith upon learning of the change of the person’s owned motor vehicle, watercraft and aircraft registration information. Whenever a person required to register changes his owned motor vehicle, watercraft and aircraft registration information to another state, the State Police shall notify the designated law-enforcement agency of that state.

Any person required to register shall reregister either in person or electronically with the local law-enforcement agency where his residence is located within 30 minutes following any change of the electronic mail address information, any instant message, chat or other Internet communication name or identity information that the person uses or intends to use, whether within or without the Commonwealth. If a probation or parole officer becomes aware of a change of the electronic mail address information, any instant message, chat or other Internet communication name or identity information for any of his probationers or parolees required to register, the probation or parole officer shall notify the State Police forthwith upon learning of the change.

Every person required to register shall submit to be photographed by a local law-enforcement agency every two years, during such person’s required verification month and time interval pursuant to subsection B of §

9.1-904

, commencing with the date of initial verification. The local law-enforcement agency shall forthwith forward the photograph of a type and kind specified by the State Police to the State Police. Where practical, the local law-enforcement agency may electronically transfer a digital photograph containing the required information to the Registry.

Upon registration and every two years thereafter during such person’s required verification month and time interval pursuant to subsection B of §

9.1-904

, every person required to register shall be required to execute a consent form consistent with applicable law that authorizes a business or organization that offers electronic communications or remote computer services to provide to the Department of State Police any information pertaining to that person necessary to determine the veracity of his electronic identity information in the Registry.

The registration shall be maintained in the Registry and shall include the person’s name, any former name if he has lawfully changed his name during the period for which he is required to register, all aliases that he has used or under which he may have been known, the date and locality of the conviction for which registration is required, his fingerprints and a photograph of a type and kind specified by the State Police, his date of birth, social security number, current physical and mailing address and a description of the offense or offenses for which he was convicted. The registration shall also include the locality of the conviction and a description of the offense or offenses for previous convictions for the offenses set forth in §

9.1-902

.

The local law-enforcement agency shall forthwith forward to the State Police all necessary registration or reregistration information received by it. Upon receipt of registration or reregistration information the State Police shall forthwith notify the chief law-enforcement officer of the locality listed as the person’s address on the registration and reregistration.

If a person required to register does not have a legal residence, such person shall designate a location that can be located with reasonable specificity where he resides or habitually locates himself. For the purposes of this section, “residence” shall include such a designated location. If the person wishes to change such designated location, he shall do it pursuant to the terms of this section.

History.

2003, c. 584; 2004, c. 834; 2005, c. 586; 2006, cc. 857, 914; 2007, cc. 718, 759, 823; 2008, c. 220; 2010, c. 843; 2014, c. 677; 2020, c. 829; 2022, cc. 41, 42.

Cross references.

As to required blood, saliva, or tissue sample for DNA analysis upon conviction of certain crimes, see §

19.2-310.2

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, c. 677, cl. 2 provides: “That any person required to register who has changed his name prior to July 1, 2014, who has not already reregistered following the change of name shall register in person with the local law-enforcement agency within three days of July 1, 2014.”

Acts 2020, c. 829, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 75 S, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2020, provides: “Effective July 1, 2016, the Compensation Board is authorized to withhold reimbursements due to the locality for sheriff’s law enforcement expenses if the sheriff fails to certify to the Board that the sheriff’s office is compliant with the sex offender registration requirements of §

9.1-903

, Code of Virginia. Upon subsequent certification by the sheriff that the sheriff’s office is compliant with the sex offender registration requirements of §

9.1-903

, Code of Virginia, the Compensation Board shall make reimbursement of withheld funding due to the locality when such subsequent certification is made within the same fiscal year that funds have been withheld.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 834 inserted “where he physically resides” in the second sentence of subsection A; inserted “in a state civil commitment program for sexually violent predators” in the first sentence of subsection B; and in subsection D, deleted “within 10 days” following “reregister in person” in the first sentence and added the second and third sentences.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 586 inserted “and every juvenile found delinquent of an offense for which registration is required under subsection C of §

9.1-902

” in the first sentence of subsection A.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 857 and 914 are identical, and in subsection A, inserted “immediately” in the third sentence and, in the last sentence, inserted “Upon conviction” and “forthwith” and deleted “within seven days of the date of sentencing” at the end; in subsection B, substituted “three days” for “10 days” twice in the first sentence, added the second sentence, in the third sentence, substituted “one set” for “two sets,” inserted “place of employment information” and substituted “one photograph” for “two photographs,” added the fourth and fifth sentences, and substituted “forthwith” for “promptly” in the last sentence; inserted “physical” in subsection C; in subsection D, substituted “three days” for “10 days” in the second sentence and “forthwith” for “within 10 days” in the fourth sentence; added subsection E; redesignated former subsections E and F as subsections F and G; and substituted “forthwith” for “promptly” in the first sentence of subsection G.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 718 substituted “subsection G” for “subsection C” in the first sentence of subsection A; in subsection B, in the second sentence, substituted “and as part of the registration shall submit to be photographed” for “submit to be photographed as part of the registration, and” and “submit to have his fingerprints and palm prints taken” for “and,” inserted “his” preceding “place” and added the language beginning “and provide vehicle” at the end and in the third sentence, inserted “one set of palm prints” and “vehicle registration information for all vehicles owned by the registrant”; added the last sentence in subsection C; deleted “of residence” at the end of the next-to-last sentence in subsection D; added subsection F; and redesignated remaining subsections accordingly.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 759 and 823 are identical, and in subsection B, inserted “electronic mail address information, any instant message, chat or other Internet communication name or identity information that the person uses or intends to use” twice and made related changes; added subsection F [now G]; and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 220 inserted “and submission to the DNA databank” in the second sentence of subsection B, substituted “motor vehicle, watercraft and aircraft registration” for “vehicle registration” throughout subsections B and F, and substituted
“motor vehicles, watercraft and aircraft owned” for “vehicles owned” in the second and third sentences of subection B.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 843 inserted “who has a permanent physical address” in subsection C; and added subsection J.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 677, in subsection D, added the second sentence; and in subsection H, inserted “any former name if he has lawfully changed his name during the period for which he is required to register.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 829 substituted “subsection C” for “subsection G,” deleted “and” preceding “reregister,” and inserted “and verify his registration information” following “reregister” in subsection A; inserted “and verification of his registration information” following “reregistration” in subsection B; added subsections H and I; added the subsection J designator; substituted subsection K designator for subsection I designator; and substituted subsection L designator for subsection J designator.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 41 and 42 are identical, and in subsection B, rewrote the penultimate sentence, which read: “If a sample has been previously taken from the person, as indicated by the Local Inmate Data System (LIDS), no additional sample shall be taken”; and made a stylistic change.

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Criminal Law and Procedure,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 83 (2006).

For 2007 annual survey article, “Criminal Law and Procedure,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 311 (2007).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-2532. Order of Remand — Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry.

§ 9.1-904.
Periodic verification.

For purposes of this chapter, “verify his registration information” means that the person required to register has notified the State Police; confirmed his current physical and mailing address and electronic mail address information and any instant message, chat, or other Internet communication name or identity information that he uses or intends to use; and provided such other information, including identifying information, that the State Police may require.

Any person required to register shall verify his registration information with the State Police, during such person’s required verification month and time interval, commencing with the date of initial registration, as follows:

Any person convicted of a Tier III offense or murder, four times each year at three-month intervals, including the person’s birth month; and

Any person convicted of a violation of §

18.2-472.1

, in which such person was included on the Registry for a conviction of a Tier III offense or murder, every month.

The State Police shall make available to the person an address verification form to be used for verification of his registration information. The form shall contain in bold print a statement indicating that failure to comply with the verification required is punishable as provided in §

18.2-472.1

. Copies of all forms to be used for verification and guidelines for submitting such forms, including month and time verification intervals, shall be available through distribution by the State Police, from local law-enforcement agencies, and in a format capable of being downloaded and printed from a website maintained by the State Police.

Persons required to register with last names beginning with A through L shall verify their registration information with the State Police from the first to the fifteenth of such person’s verification months pursuant to subsection B, and persons required to register with last names beginning with M through Z shall verify their registration information with the State Police from the sixteenth to the last day of the month during such person’s verification months pursuant to subsection B. The last name shall be the last name in the person’s name pursuant to §

9.1-903

as it appears in the Registry.

For the period of July 1, 2020, to July 1, 2021, any person required to verify his registration information shall continue to verify his resignation information with the State Police on such person’s verification schedule in place prior to July 1, 2020, until such person has verified his registration information pursuant to the new verification schedule provided in subsection B, at which time such person shall continue to verify his registration information pursuant to the new verification schedule.

History.

2003, c. 584; 2006, cc. 857, 914; 2007, cc. 759, 823; 2019, cc. 613, 614; 2020, c. 829.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 613 and 614, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2020.”

Acts 2019, cc. 613 and 614, cl. 3 provides: “That, no later than June 1, 2020, the Department of State Police shall inform every person required to register with the Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry Act (§

9.1-900

et seq. of the Code of Virginia) in person of the new registration and reregistration system required by the provisions of this act and provide the person with a written description of the requirements for compliance with the provisions of this act, including the new reregistration schedule.”

Acts 2019, cc. 613 and 614, cl. 4 provides: “That, no later than July 1, 2020, the Department of State Police shall maintain a website with access to the written description of the requirements for compliance with the provisions of this act, including the new month and time registration and reregistration schedule mandated by this act, and any forms and guidelines required under the Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry Act (§

9.1-900

et seq. of the Code of Virginia) in a format capable of being downloaded and printed.”

Acts 2020, c. 829, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 857 and 914 are identical, and inserted the subsection A designation at the beginning of the first paragraph; in subsection A, inserted “or murder” in the first and second sentences and deleted “a Class 1 misdemeanor or a Class 6 felony as” following “punishable as” in the last sentence; and added subsections B and C.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 759 and 823 are identical, and inserted “and electronic mail address information, any instant message, chat or other Internet communication name or identity information that he uses or intends to use” in the third sentence in subsections A and B; and added the last sentence in subsection A.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 613 and 614 are identical, effective July 1, 2020, and in subsection A, deleted “other than a person convicted of a sexually violent offense or murder” preceding “shall reregister,” substituted “on a schedule pursuant to this section” for “on an annual basis from the date of the initial registration. Every person convicted of a sexually violent offense or murder shall reregister with the State Police every 90 days from the date of initial registration,” and inserted the fifth sentence; deleted former subsection B, which read: “Any person convicted of a violation of §

18.2-472.1

, other than a person convicted of a sexually violent offense or murder, shall reregister with the State Police every 180 days from the date of such conviction. Any person convicted of a violation of §

18.2-472.1

, in which such person was included on the Registry for a conviction of a sexually violent offense or murder, shall reregister with the State Police every 30 days from the date of conviction. Reregistration means the person has notified the State Police, confirmed his current physical and mailing address and electronic mail address information, any instant message, chat or other Internet communication name or identity information that he uses or intends to use, and provided such other information, including identifying information, which the State Police may require. Upon registration and as may be necessary thereafter, the State Police shall provide the person with an address verification form to be used for reregistration. The form shall state the registration requirements and contain in bold print a statement indicating that failure to comply with the registration requirements is punishable as provided in § 18.2-472.1”; in subsection B, inserted “during such person’s required reregistration month and time interval pursuant to subsections C and D”; added subsections C through E; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 829 rewrote the section.

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Criminal Law and Procedure,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 83 (2006).

§ 9.1-905.
New residents and nonresident offenders; registration required.

All persons required to register shall register within three days of establishing a residence in the Commonwealth.

Nonresident offenders entering the Commonwealth for an extended visit, for employment, to carry on a vocation, or as a student attending school who are required to register in their state of residence or who would be required to register if a resident of the Commonwealth shall, within three days of entering the Commonwealth for an extended visit, accepting employment or enrolling in school in the Commonwealth, be required to register and reregister in person with the local law-enforcement agency.

To document employment or school attendance in Virginia a person shall present proof of enrollment as a student or suitable proof of temporary employment in the Commonwealth and one photo-identification form issued by a governmental agency of the person’s state of residence which contains the person’s complete name, gender, date of birth and complete address.

For purposes of this section:“Employment” and “carry on a vocation” include employment that is full-time or part-time for a period of time exceeding 14 days or for an aggregate period of time exceeding 30 days during any calendar year, whether financially compensated, volunteered, or for the purpose of government or educational benefit.“Extended visit” means a period of visitation for any purpose in the Commonwealth of 30 days or more.“Student” means a person who is enrolled on a full-time or part-time basis, in any public or private educational institution, including any secondary school, trade or professional institution, or institution of higher education.

History.

2003, c. 584; 2005, c. 603; 2006, cc. 857, 914.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 603, in subsection B, inserted “an extended visit, for” preceding “employment, to carry” and “entering the Commonwealth for an extended visit” preceding “accepting employment”; and added the definition of “Extended visit” in subsection D.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 857 and 914 are identical, and substituted “three days” for “10 days” in subsections A and B.

§ 9.1-906.
Enrollment or employment at institution of higher education; information required.

Persons required to register, reregister, or verify their registration information who are enrolled in or employed at institutions of higher education shall, in addition to other registration requirements, indicate on their registration, reregistration, and verification form the name and location of the institution attended by or employing the registrant whether such institution is within or without the Commonwealth. In addition, persons required to register, reregister, or verify their registration information shall notify the local law-enforcement agency in person within three days of any change in their enrollment or employment status with an institution of higher education. The local law-enforcement agency shall forthwith forward to the State Police all necessary registration or reregistration information received by it.

Upon receipt of a registration, reregistration, or verification of registration information indicating enrollment or employment with an institution of higher education or notification of a change in status, the State Police shall notify the chief law-enforcement officer of the institution’s law-enforcement agency or, if there is no institutional law-enforcement agency, the local law-enforcement agency serving that institution, of the registration, reregistration, verification of registration information, or change in status. The law-enforcement agency receiving notification under this section shall make such information available upon request.

For purposes of this section:“Employment” includes full- or part-time, temporary or permanent or contractual employment at an institution of higher education either with or without compensation.“Enrollment” includes both full- and part-time.“Institution of higher education” means any postsecondary school, trade or professional institution, or institution of higher education.

History.

2003, c. 584; 2006, cc. 857, 914; 2020, c. 829.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission,
the following changes were made to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588: substituted “higher education” for “higher learning” throughout the section; substituted “institution of higher education” for “institute of higher learning” in subsection B; and made minor stylistic changes.

Acts 2020, c. 829, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 857 and 914 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “three days” for “10 days” in the second sentence and “forthwith” for “promptly” in the last sentence.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 829 deleted “or” preceding “reregister,” inserted “or verify their registration information” following “reregister,” deleted “and” preceding “reregistration,” and inserted “and verification” following “reregistration” in subsection A; deleted “or” following “reregistration,” inserted “or verification of registration information” following “reregistration,” and inserted “verification of registration information” following “reregistration” in subsection B.

§ 9.1-906.1.
Emergency shelters; notification; registration.

Any person required to register or reregister who enters any place or facility that is designated by the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof as an emergency shelter and operated in response to a state or local emergency declared pursuant to Chapter 3.2 (§ 44-146.13 et seq.) of Title 44 shall, as soon as practicable after entry, notify a member of the emergency shelter’s staff who is responsible for providing security at the emergency shelter that such person is a registered sex offender. The use of such Registry information pursuant to this section does not constitute a violation of §

9.1-918

. No person shall be denied entry into an emergency shelter solely on the basis of his status as a registered sex offender unless such entry is otherwise prohibited by law.

History.

2022, c. 316.

Editor's note.

Acts 2022, c. 316, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of State Police shall provide to any person required to register on the Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry at the time of his initial registration a summary of the provisions of this act.”